Massachusetts, session 194th, S1761.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Definitions
For the purpose of this section the following words shall have the following meanings:-
"Public Safety Dispatchers” or “Public Safety Telecommunicators", an individual
employed by a public safety agency, as the initial first responder, whose primary responsibility is
to receive, process, transmit, or dispatch emergency and non-emergency calls for law
enforcement, fire, emergency medical, and other public safety services by telephone, radio, or
other communication device, and includes an individual who promotes from this position and
supervises individuals who perform these functions
of 2

SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any general or special law or rule or regulation to the
contrary, all Public Safety Dispatchers or Public Safety Telecommunicators shall receive the
same internal benefits as First Responders.
SECTION 3. No change shall be made to such Telecommunicators' compensation and
pension benefits.
of 2